lt-LT: Dagčio laikiklių medžiaga: Aliuminis; Žalvaris; Nerūdijantis plienas; Skarda; Cinkas; Kita
sk-SK: Materiál jazýčka knôtu: Hliník; Mosadz; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Pocínovaný plech; Zinok; Iné
sv: Material för veketåga: Aluminium; Mässing; Rostfritt stål; Bleckplåt; Zink; Övrigt
tr: Fitil taban malzemesi: Alüminyum; Pirinç; Paslanmaz çelik; Teneke; Çinko; Diğer
el: Υλικό γλωττίδας φυτιλιού: Αλουμίνιο; Ορείχαλκος; Ανοξείδωτο ατσάλι; Λευκοσίδηρος; Ψευδάργυρος; Άλλο
hu: Kanócfül anyaga: Alumínium; Sárgaréz; Rozsdamentes acél; Bádoglemez; Cink; Egyéb
zh-CN: 灯芯/烛芯底座材质: 铝; 黄铜; 不锈钢; 马口铁; 锌; 其他
zh-TW: 燈芯固定片材質: 鋁; 黃銅; 不鏽鋼; 馬口鐵; 鋅; 其他
hr-HR: Materijal fitiljne pločice: Aluminij; Mjed; Nehrđajući čelik; Bijeli lim; Cink; Ostalo
pl: Materiał blaszki knota: Aluminium; Mosiądz; Stal nierdzewna; Blacha ocynowana; Cynk; Inne
cs: Materiál podložky knotu: Hliník; Mosaz; Nerezová ocel; Bílý plech; Zinek; Jiný
da: Materiale i vægefod: Aluminium; Messing; Rustfrit stål; Blik; Zink; Andet
pt-BR: Material da aba do pavio: Alumínio; Latão; Aço inoxidável; Flandres; Zinco; Outro
ro-RO: Material al bazei metalice pentru fitil: Aluminiu; Alamă; Oțel inoxidabil; Tablă cositorită; Zinc; Altele
bg-BG: Материал на държача на фитила: Алуминий; Месинг; Неръждаема стомана; Калайдисана ламарина; Цинк; Друго
vi: Chất liệu đế giữ bấc: Nhôm; Đồng thau; Thép không gỉ; Sắt tây; Kẽm; Khác
it: Materiale della linguetta dello stoppino: Alluminio; Ottone; Acciaio inossidabile; Banda stagnata; Zinco; Altro
fr: Matériau de la languette de mèche: Aluminium; Laiton; Acier inoxydable; Fer-blanc; Zinc; Autre
ru: Материал язычка фитиля: Алюминий; Латунь; Нержавеющая сталь; Белая жесть; Цинк; Другое
fi: Sydänpidikkeen materiaali: Alumiini; Messinki; Ruostumaton teräs; Tinapelti; Sinkki; Muu
ja: 芯タブ素材: アルミニウム; 真鍮; ステンレススチール; ブリキ; 亜鉛; その他
pt-PT: Material da aba do pavio: Alumínio; Latão; Aço inoxidável; Folha de flandres; Zinco; Outro
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำฐานรองไส้เทียน: อะลูมิเนียม; ทองเหลือง; สเตนเลสสตีล; แผ่นดีบุก; สังกะสี; อื่นๆ
es: Material de la base de la mecha: Aluminio; Latón; Acero inoxidable; Hojalata; Zinc; Otro
nb: Materiale i vekebase: Aluminium; Messing; Rustfritt stål; Blikk; Sink; Annet
en: Wick tab material: Aluminum; Brass; Stainless steel; Tinplate; Zinc; Other
de: Material des Dochtfußes: Aluminium; Messing; Edelstahl; Weißblech; Zink; Andere
sl-SI: Material podstavka: Aluminij; Medenina; Nerjavno jeklo; Bela pločevina; Cink; Drugo
nl: Materiaal lontplaatje: Aluminium; Messing; Roestvrij staal; Blik; Zink; Overig
ko: 심지 탭 소재: 알루미늄; 황동; 스테인리스 스틸; 틴플레이트; 아연; 기타